Utah statutes.
26-6b-4.   Judicial review by the district court -- Required notice --
Representation by counsel -- Conduct of proceedings.
(1)  The provisions of this section and Sections 26-6b-5 through 26-6b-7 apply
if a department issues an order for restriction, and:
(a)  an individual subject to the order of restriction refuses to consent to
the order of restriction;
(b)  an individual subject to an order of restriction has withdrawn consent to
an order of restriction under the provisions of Subsection
26-6b-3.1(1)(b)(iv)(B); or
(c)  the department chooses to not attempt to obtain consent to an order of
restriction and files an action for judicial review of the order of
restriction.
(2) (a)  If the individual who is subject to an order of restriction is in
custody, the department, which is the petitioner, shall provide to the
individual written notice of the petition for judicial review of the order of
restriction and hearings held pursuant to Sections 26-6b-5 through 26-6b-7 as
soon as practicable, and shall send the notice to the legal guardian, legal
counsel for the parties involved, and any other persons and immediate adult
family members whom the individual or the district court designates.  The
notice shall advise these persons that a hearing may be held within the time
provided by this chapter.
(b)  If the individual has refused to permit release of information necessary
for the provision of notice under this Subsection (2), the extent of notice
shall be determined by the district court.
(c)  Notwithstanding the notice requirement in Subsection (2)(a), if the court
determines that written notice to each individual in a group of individuals
subject to an order of restriction is not practical considering the
circumstances of the threat to public health, the court may order the
department to provide notice to the individual or group of individuals in a
manner determined by the court.
(3) (a)  If the individual who is subject to an order of restriction is in
custody, he shall be afforded an opportunity to be represented by counsel.  If
neither the individual nor others provide for counsel, the district court
shall appoint counsel and allow counsel sufficient time to consult with the
individual prior to the hearing.  If the individual is indigent, the payment
of reasonable attorney fees for counsel, as determined by the district court,
shall be made by the county in which the individual resides or was found.
(b)  The parties may appear at the hearings, to testify, and to present and
cross-examine witnesses.  The district court may, in its discretion, receive
the testimony of any other individual.
(c)  The district court may allow a waiver of the individual's right to appear
only for good cause shown, and that cause shall be made a part of the court
record.
(d)  The district court may order that the individual participate in the
hearing by telephonic or other electronic means if the individual's condition
poses a health threat to those who physically attend the hearing or to others
if the individual is transported to the court.
(4)  The district court may, in its discretion, order that the individual be
moved to a more appropriate treatment, quarantine, or isolation facility
outside of its jurisdiction, and may transfer the proceedings to any other
district court within this state where venue is proper, provided that the
transfer will not be adverse to the legal interests of the individual.
(5)  All persons to whom notice is required to be given may attend the
hearings.  The district court may exclude from the hearing all persons not
necessary for the conduct of the proceedings.
(6)  All hearings shall be conducted in as informal a manner as may be
consistent with orderly procedure, and in a physical setting that is not
likely to have a harmful effect on the health of the individual or others
required to participate in the hearing.
(7)  The district court shall receive all relevant and material evidence which
is offered, subject to Utah Rules of Evidence.
(8)  The district court may order law enforcement to assist the petitioner in
locating the individuals subject to restriction and enforcing the order of
restriction.
